New Jersey, session 221, A3728.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The State of New Jersey requests that the Joint Committee on the Library of Congress approve the replacement of the New Jersey statue of Philip Kearny in the National Statuary Hall Collection with a statue of Alice Paul. 2.    The Secretary of State shall submit to the United States Architect of the Capitol for his or her review for completeness a written request from the Governor to approve the replacement.  The Governors request shall also include a description of the location in New Jersey where the replaced statue of Philip Kearny will be displayed after it is transferred and a copy of this act requesting such replacement.  After such review, the Governor and Legislature calls on the architect to forward the request to the Joint Committee on the Library of Congress for its approval or denial.  If the request is approved by the committee, the architect and the Secretary of State, acting on behalf of the State of New Jersey, shall enter into an agreement pursuant to 2 U.S.C. 2132(b). 3.    a.   There is created the National Statuary Hall Selection Committee.  The committee shall be temporary and consist of seven members, appointed as follows: (1)   two members appointed by the Governor, upon recommendation of the Senate President, not more than one of whom shall be from the same political party; (2)   two members appointed by the Governor, upon recommendation of the Speaker of the General Assembly, not more than one of whom shall be from the same political party; (3)   the Secretary of State, or the designee thereof; and (4)   two members appointed by the Governor, not more than one of whom shall be from the same political party. The members of the committee shall select a member of the committee to be the chair and a member of a different political party to be vice chair.  Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.  Members shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The chair shall appoint a secretary to the committee, who need not be a member of the committee. A quorum of the members shall be the majority of the members.  The members shall be appointed within 45 days following the enactment of this act and shall organize as soon as practicable after the appointment of the majority of its members. b.    Upon approval by the Joint Committee of the Library of Congress and pursuant to the agreement provided for in section 2 of this act, the committee shall: (1)   select a sculptor to create a statue of Alice Paul to be placed in the National Statuary Hall Collection, and review and approve the plans for the statue; and (2)   identify a method to obtain the funding necessary to pay for the following items: (a)   the sculptor for designing and carving or casting the statue; (b)   the design and fabrication of the pedestal; (c)   the transportation of the statue and pedestal to the United States Capitol; (d)   the removal and transportation of the replaced statue; (e)   the temporary placement of the new statue in the Rotunda of the United States Capitol for the unveiling ceremony; (f)   the unveiling ceremony; and (g)   such other expenses that the committee determines are necessary to incur to replace the New Jersey statue of Philip Kearny with that of Alice Paul. c.     The committee shall complete its work within one year of its initial organizational meeting and terminate upon completion of a written report on its activities.  Copies of the report shall be transmitted to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, and any other official required to receive reports pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1).  Copies of the report shall also be made available to the general public. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.